Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 2655YC (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0r. Be subject to and comply with the 3 requirements of section 279.87 relating to the development and 4 administration of an advanced mathematics pathway. 5 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraph: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 8 requirements of section 279.87 relating to the development and 9 administration of an advanced mathematics pathway. 10 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 279.87 Advanced mathematics pathway. 11 1. The board of directors of each school district shall 12 develop an advanced mathematics pathway that is designed to 13 enable students to succeed in courses related to algebra in 14 grade eight. The advanced mathematics pathway must incorporate 15 instructional supports to help students succeed in the 16 advanced mathematics pathway, including mathematics activities, 17 additional instructional time, high-dosage tutoring, small 18 group instruction, and technology-enabled activities. For 19 purposes of this section, âadvanced mathematics pathwayâ means a 20 sequence of courses and curricula that accelerates or combines 21 mathematics instruction that is typically provided to students 22 enrolled in grades six through eight. 23 2. The board of directors of each school district shall 24 automatically enroll a student in the advanced mathematics 25 pathway if any of the following apply: 26 a. The student performed at grade level or higher on 27 the statewide summative assessment in mathematics that was 28 administered to the student when the student was enrolled in 29 grades five, six, or seven. 30 b. The student demonstrated proficiency in mathematics as 31 indicated in the studentâs mathematics grades, class rank, or 32 other local measure, when the student was enrolled in grades 33 five, six, or seven. 34 c. The studentâs parent or guardian requested that the 35 -1- LSB 2655YC (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 5 H.F. _____ student be enrolled. 1 3. Notwithstanding subsection 2, the board of directors of 2 a school district shall not enroll a student in the advanced 3 mathematics pathway if the studentâs parent or guardian 4 requests that the student not be enrolled. 5 4. a. The board of directors of each school district 6 shall provide to students, and to the parents or guardians of 7 students, all of the following: 8 (1) Information related to the importance of mathematics in 9 grades six, seven, and eight. 10 (2) How grades six, seven, and eight mathematics courses 11 impact the sequence of mathematics courses in grades nine 12 through twelve. 13 (3) A list of all mathematics courses available to students 14 enrolled in grades seven and eight and the mathematics courses 15 available to students enrolled in grades nine through twelve. 16 b. The board of directors of each school district shall 17 publish the information described in paragraph âaâ on the school 18 districtâs internet site and in the school districtâs student 19 handbook. 20 5. a. On or before June 30 each year, the board of 21 directors of each school district shall report annually to the 22 department of education all of the following: 23 (1) A list of the advanced mathematics courses available to 24 students enrolled in the school district in grades seven and 25 eight. 26 (2) A list of additional mathematics instructional supports 27 offered by the school district and the number and percentage 28 of students enrolled in the school district who use such 29 instructional supports. 30 (3) Information related to the number of students enrolled 31 in the school district who performed at grade level or higher 32 on the statewide summative assessment in mathematics that was 33 administered to students enrolled in grades five, six, and 34 seven. The information shall include the studentâs score on 35 -2- LSB 2655YC (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 5 H.F. _____ the assessment, race, family income, and gender. 1 (4) Of the students described in subparagraph (3), 2 information related to all of the following: 3 (a) The number and percentage of students who were enrolled 4 in advanced mathematics courses during the subsequent school 5 year, including courses related to algebra in grade eight. 6 (b) The number and percentage of students who participated 7 in the advanced mathematics pathway pursuant to subsection 2, 8 paragraph âcâ . 9 (c) The number and percentage of students who did not 10 participate in the advanced mathematics pathway pursuant to 11 subsection 3. 12 b. On or before December 31 of each year, the department 13 of education shall compile the annual reports submitted 14 under paragraph âaâ and file the compilation with the general 15 assembly. 16 Sec. 4. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 17 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 18 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 19 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 20 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 21 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 22 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 23 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 24 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 25 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 26 districts. 27